Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-355
Defendant; proper service or appearance.

No marriage shall be dissolved or legal separation decreed unless the defendant has been properly served with process or entered an appearance in the case.

Laws 1972, LB 820, § 9;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 48;

Laws 2004, LB 1207, § 22.